Utah statutes.
41-1a-513.   Examination of registration records and indices of stolen and
recovered vehicles, vessels, and outboard motors.
The division upon receiving application for any certificate of title shall
first check the identification number shown in the application against the
indices of registered vehicles, vessels, and outboard motors and against
indices of stolen and recovered vehicles, vessels, and outboard motors.
